North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
TRANSITION SCHEDULE

Sections 1 to 25. 1 to 25. Repealed

Section 26.

The legislative assembly shall provide for the editing, and for the publication in an independent volume, of this constitution as soon as it shall take effect, and whenever it shall be altered or amended, and shall cause to be published in the same volume
the Declaration of Independence, the Constitution of the United States and the Enabling Act.

Done at Bismarck, Dakota, in open convention, this 17th day of August, A.D. 1889.

B.B. FANCHER,

President.

JOHN G. HAMILTON, Chief Clerk

APPENDIX OF HISTORICAL NOTES
CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA

This Appendix shows the disposition of sections of the Constitution of North Dakota and the articles of amendment thereto as renumbered in 1980 by the North Dakota legislative council pursuant to section 46-03-11.1 of the Century Code. The notes on sections
and articles which were repealed prior to 1981 contain the complete text of the original provisions and amendments. Also included are annotations of pertinent cases decided under the former sections and articles.